Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 435 Offenses Against Persons [Repealed]

435.010.
Murder. [Repealed.]

435.020.
Voluntary manslaughter. [Repealed.]

435.022.
Involuntary manslaughter. [Repealed.]

435.025.
Death occurring as result of negligently operating motor vehicle. [Repealed.]

435.030.
Homicide occurring in course of criminal syndicalism or sedition. [Repealed.]

435.040.
Homicide occurring in course of abortion. [Repealed.]

435.050.
Homicide occurring in course of striking, stabbing or shooting. [Repealed.]

435.060.
Homicide or injury resulting from obstruction of road. [Repealed.]

435.070.
Lynching or mob violence. [Repealed.]

435.080.
Rape of child under twelve — Attempted rape. [Repealed.]

435.090.
Rape of female over twelve. [Repealed.]

435.100.
Carnal knowledge of female child under eighteen with her consent, or of male child under eighteen. [Repealed.]

435.105.
Indecent or immoral practices with another. [Repealed.]

435.110.
Taking or detaining woman against her will. [Repealed.]

435.120.
Taking girl under fourteen away from parents. [Repealed.]

435.130.
Taking or enticing away or detaining child under ten. [Repealed.]

435.140.
Kidnapping. [Repealed.]

435.150.
Unlawful arrest, imprisonment or transportation out of State. [Repealed.]

435.160.
Maiming. [Repealed.]

435.170.
Malicious and wilful shooting, cutting or poisoning — Shooting or throwing missile into train, station, steamboat, motor vehicle or building. [Repealed.]

435.180.
Shooting, wounding or cutting in sudden affray or heat and passion, without previous malice. [Repealed.]

435.190.
Reckless shooting or throwing of missile into train, station or motor vehicle. [Repealed.]

435.200.
Drawing, flourishing or recklessly using deadly weapon. [Repealed.]

435.210.
Drawing or flourishing deadly weapon in passenger coach. [Repealed.]

435.220.
Shooting firearms in city. [Repealed.]

435.230.
Carrying concealed deadly weapon — Selling deadly weapon to minor.
[Repealed.]

435.235.
Confiscation of deadly weapons. [Repealed.]

435.240.
Abandonment of child under sixteen or pregnant wife in destitute circumstances — Postponement of prosecution — Power of circuit court over verdict or indictment — Desertion, abandonment or nonsupport by divorced parent — Taking of child from divorced parent to whom custody has been awarded.
[Repealed.]

435.250.
Sending threatening letter — Incriminating testimony. [Repealed.]

435.260.
Demand of thing of value by menace or threat of violence. [Repealed.]

435.270.
Blackmail. [Repealed.]

435.280.
Oral threat similar to blackmail. [Repealed.]

435.290.
Nature of threat in KRS 435.270 or 435.280. [Repealed.]

435.300.
Spreading slanderous report. [Repealed.]

435.310.
Fraudulently having one adjudged of unsound mind or confined in an institution. [Repealed.]

435.320.
Disclosure of information obtained during employment to aid competitor of employer. [Repealed.]